src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
- **+v1				** = n/a
- **+v2				** = n/a
- **^Adj	** = Adjective- used in initial mutations
- **^Ath	** = Athrú (Change) - in certain plurals the ending changes : "e" -> "í",  "each" -> "í" and "ach" changes to "aí" etc.eg gealach -> gealaí (of the moon)
- **^C		** = nominative, genitive & vocative : initial mutations of plural nouns 
- **^CB		** = compound boundary
- **^Caol	** = Caolú (slenderise)- Attenuation : ie slenderise the end of word 	! Usually by adding an "i" after  the last broad vowel 
- **^Coim	** = Coimriú - Syncopation - the last unstressed vowel is dropped	! eg saghas (type) ->saghs +anna, solas->soils+e (light) - with attenation also
- **^Def	** = dntls rule after definite article
- **^Do		** = d' before Past Imperfect (gnáthchaite) and conditional
- **^Emph	** = emphatic forms
- **^F		** = feminine: initial mutations of singular nouns depend on whether the noun is masculine or feminine
- **^Fr		** = Fréamh (root) use root - i.e.don't syncopate in these cases 
- **^G		** = genitive case
- **^GUESSNOUN	** = n/a - superseded by guesser FSTs
- **^IM		** = initial mutation marker e.g. mo chat, ar an mballa
- **^LC		** = Leathan/Caol: (broad/slender) Leathnaítear an tús mura dtosnaíonn an foirceann le "t"
- **^Lea	** = Leathnú - Broadening eg an "i" is removed 	! súil (eye); radharc na súl (eyesight)
- **^LeaS	** = Leathnaítear an tús mura dtosnaíonn an foirceann le "t"
- **^M 		** = masculine: initial mutations of singular nouns depend on whether the noun is masculine or feminine
- **^Sé		** = Lenition (Séimhiú - softening)- h added after certain initial consonants (bcdfgmpst)
- **^Urú	** = Eclipsis (Urú)- a letter placed before word initial letter  (bcdfgpt), e.g.  "g" before "c" - "an cat" in gen. pl. becomes "bia na gcat", (the cats' food) 
- **^V		** = Verb root
- **^VH		** = Maintains vowel harmony of broad and slender vowels  Motto : "leathan le leathan agus caol le caol" (slender with slender and   broad with broad)
- **^VN		** = verbal noun
- **^aigh 	** = remove -aigh ending
- **^hv		** = "h" before a vowel (eg éan : Nom. Pl. Masc. na héin - the birds) 
- **^igh 	** = remove -igh ending
- **^ts		** = "t" before "s"   eg sagart : Gen Sg.Masc. teach an tsagairt - the priest's house
- **^tv		** = "t-" before a vowel (eg éan : Nom. Sg. Masc. an t-éan - the bird) 

## Flag diacritics

- **@P.Pmatch.Loc 	** = XXX

We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

# The Root lexicon etc.

- **LEXICON Root			** = 
- **	Abbrev;				** = 
- **	Prepositions;		** = Adpositions = Prepositions in 
- **	Adverb;				** = 
- **	Articles;			** = 
- **	Conjunctions;		** = 
- **	Determiners;		** = 
- **	Interjections;		** = 
- **	Fillers;			** = 
- **	Communicators;		** = 
- **	Events;				** = 
- **	Anonymous;			** = 
- **	Numerals;			** = 
- **	Particles;			** = 
- **	Personal_Pronouns;	** = 

- **	Englishlex;				** = English lexicon including all parts of speech
- **	Communicators-English;	** = English multi word communicators, e.g. d'ya know
- **	Bardiclex;				** = classical Irish lexicon from TCD Bardic corpus - 
- **	Latinlex;				** = Latin lexicom from RIA historical corpus
- **	!Tobar;					** = omitting this (non-standard older forms)

- **	Punctuation;		** = 
- **	Punctuation_ga;		** = 
- **	Symbols;			** = 
- **	XMLTags; 			** = XML tags e.g. <p>, <title> etc.

- **	AdjA;				** = ORIGINAL TEST LEXICON
- **	AdjIrregular;			** = ORIGINAL TEST LEXICON
- **	Adj-BaseOnly;	!AdjBASE;	** = ORIGINAL TEST LEXICON
- **	Adj-IrregComp;	!AI-COMP;	** = ORIGINAL TEST LEXICON
- **	AdjB;				** = punk adjs
- **	AdjC;				** = FP adjs - auto
- **	AdjDath; 			** = colours
- **	AdjE;				** = FP adjs - manual
- **	Adj-FGB1;			** = Foclóir Gaeilge Béarla Uí Dhónaill
- **	Adj-FGB2;			** = Foclóir Gaeilge Béarla Uí Dhónaill
- **	AdjVariants;			** = Adj Variants in FGB
- **	AdjEqualVariants;		** = Adj Variants with Equal Sign in FGB
- **	AdjF;				** = Nationalities
- **	AdjG;				** = additions from gaois.ie bitex

- **	Nouns; 			** = ORIGINAL TEST LEXICON
- **	Dative;			** = ORIGINAL TEST LEXICON
- **	Other;			** = ORIGINAL TEST LEXICON
- **	NounsB;			** = nouns
- **	NounsC;			** = FP nouns (automatic)
- **	NounsD;			** = FP nouns (manual Decl 1-3)
- **	NounsE;			** = FP nouns (manual Decs 4-5)
- **	NounsF;			** = FP nouns (manual Irregular)
- **	NounsH;			** = Various from corpora
- **	NounsIrregular;	** = 
- **	Substantive;  	** = 
- **	NounsFGB1;		** = FGB (O Donaill) automatic (in NCI corpus) 
- **	NounsFGB2;		** = FGB (O Donaill) automatic (additional)
- **	NounsVariants;		** = Variants extracted from FGB
- **	NounsEqualVariants;	** = Variants extracted from FGB (2011 EUD)

- **	NounsG;			** = Proper Nouns - MOVED from Nouns TO Proper Nouns
- **	NP-LEX-FAM;			** = Family Names (Irish)
- **	NP-LEX-FAM-EN;		** = Family Names (English)
- **	NP-LEX-PERS;		** = Personal Names (Irish)
- **	NP-LEX-PERS-EN;		** = Family Names (English)
- **	NP-LEX-EIRE;		** = Ireland - Counties, Cities and Towns (Irish)
- **	NP-LEX-EIRE-EN; 	** = Ireland - Counties, Cities and Towns (English)
- **	NP-LEX-TIR;			** = Countries (Irish)
- **	NP-LEX-TIR-EN;		** = Countries (English)
- **	NP-Irregular;		** = Various Irregular Proper Nouns
- **	NP-LEX-ORG;			** = Organisations
- **	NP-LEX-LOGAINM;		** = Placenames - sample from logainm.ie
- **	NP-LEX-RIACORPAS1;	** = Various Proper nouns from RIA Historical Corpus of Irish

- **	VerbalNounsV;		** = Verbal nouns derived from verb roots
- **	VerbalNounsN;		** = Verbal nouns derived from nouns
- **	VerbalAdjs;			** = Verbal adjectives derived from verb roots
- **	VerbalNounsGenV;	** = Verbal nouns (genitive ase) derived from verb roots
- **	VerbalNounsGenN;	** = Verbal nouns (genitive ase) derived from nouns
- **	VN-Variants;		** = FGB VN variants (VN, VNG & VA included)
- **	VNEqualVariants; 	** = FGB VN = variants (VN, VNG & VA included)

- **	Verbs;				** = Irregular verbs (11)
- **	VerbsC1A;			** = ORIGINAL TEST LEXICON
- **	VerbsC2A;			** = ORIGINAL TEST LEXICON
- **	VerbsB;				** = verbs
- **	VerbsC;				** = FP verbs
- **	VerbsD;				** = FP verbs
- **	Verbs-FGB1;			** = FGB verbs
- **	Verbs-FGB2;			** = FGB verbs
- **	Verb-Variants;		** = FGB verb variants
- **	VerbsEqualVariants;	** = FGB verb = variants

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
